Hawaii statutes.
PART IV.
TRUST FUND

§87A-30 Hawaii employer-union health
benefits trust fund; establishment. There is established outside the state
treasury, a trust fund to be known as the "Hawaii Employer-Union Health
Benefits Trust Fund". The fund shall consist of contributions, interest,
income, dividends, refunds, rate credits, and other returns. It is hereby
declared that any and all sums contributed or paid from any source to the fund
created by this part, and all assets of the fund including any and all interest
and earnings on the same, are and shall be held in trust by the board for the
exclusive use and benefit of the employee-beneficiaries and
dependent-beneficiaries and shall not be subject to appropriation for any other
purpose whatsoever. The fund shall be under the control of the board and
placed under the department of budget and finance for administrative purposes.
[L 2001, c 88, pt of §1; am L 2006, c 57, §3]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next